District of Columbia statutes.
2-308.07

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 807, 32 DCR 7396
as added Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(ff), 44 DCR 1423
May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 3, 45 DCR 1687
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 3, 46 DCR 2118
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.7.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of the Procurement Reform Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-17, September 12, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5459)
For temporary amendment of subpart, see § 2 of the Procurement Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-62, April 15, 1997, 44 DCR 2413), and see § 2 of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-133, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 4832).
For temporary addition of §§ 1-1188.13 and 1-1188.14 1981 Ed., see § 2 of the Procurement Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-62, April 15, 1997, 44 DCR 2413), and see § 2 of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-133, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 4832).
For temporary repeal of §§ 1-1188.8 through 1-1188.12, see § 3 of the Procurement Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-374, April 24, 1998, 45 DCR 4338).
Section 3 of D.C. Law 12-104, as amended by § 59(a) of D.C. Law 12-264, repealed §§ 1-1188.7 through 1-1188.12 [§§ 2-308.07 through 2-308.12, 2001 Ed.].